Utah statutes.
78B-6-140.   Itemization of fees and expenses.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), prior to the date that a final decree of adoption is entered, an affidavit regarding fees and expenses, signed by the prospective adoptive parent or parents and the person or agency placing the child, shall be filed with the court.

(2)  The affidavit described in Subsection (1) shall itemize the following items in connection with the adoption:

(a)  all legal expenses, maternity expenses, medical or hospital expenses, and living expenses that have been or will be paid to or on behalf of the pre-existing parents of the child, including the source of payment;

(b)  fees paid by the prospective adoptive parent or parents in connection with the adoption;

(c)  all gifts, property, or other items that have been or will be provided to the pre-existing parents, including the source of the gifts, property, or other items;

(d)  all public funds used for any medical or hospital costs in connection with the:

(i)  pregnancy;

(ii)  delivery of the child; or

(iii)  care of the child;

(e)  the state of residence of the:

(i)  birth mother or the pre-existing parents; and

(ii)  prospective adoptive parent or parents;

(f)  a description of services provided to the prospective adoptive parents or pre-existing parents in connection with the adoption; and

(g)  that Section 76-7-203 has not been violated.

(3)  A copy of the affidavit described in Subsection (1) shall be provided to the Office of Licensing within the Department of Human Services.

(4)  This section does not apply if the prospective adoptive parent is the legal spouse of a pre-existing parent.

